Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.120

Denial, suspension, revocation of registration—Order—Request for, notice of hearing—Findings and conclusions.

Upon the entry of an order under RCW 21.20.110, the director shall promptly notify the applicant or registrant, as well as the employer or prospective employer if the applicant or registrant is a salesperson or investment adviser representative, that it has been entered and of the reasons therefor and that if requested by the applicant or registrant within twenty days after the receipt of the director's notification the matter will be promptly set down for hearing. If no hearing is requested and none is ordered by the director, the order will remain in effect until it is modified or vacated by the director. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the director, after notice of and opportunity for hearing, may modify or vacate the order or extend it until final determination. No order may be entered under RCW 21.20.110 denying or revoking registration without appropriate prior notice to the applicant or registrant (as well as the employer or prospective employer if the applicant or registrant is a salesperson or an investment adviser representative), opportunity for hearing, and written findings of fact and conclusions of law.

[ 2016 c 61 s 3; 1994 c 256 s 11; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 8; 1959 c 282 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.